Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 88. Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to allocations of tax credit and bonding limits imposed by the federal government under P.L. 111-5 (American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009), to the waiver of volume cap of recovery zone facility bonds, and to the ability of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority to reallocate facility bonds affected that waived volume cap, see § 6, ch. 68, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For a statement of the findings and purpose that applies to that section, see § 1, ch. 68, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the authority to consult with the Alaska Energy Authority on a plan for developing infrastructure to deliver more affordable energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline, to be provided by the Alaska Energy Authority to the legislature before January 1, 2017, see sec. 75, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska industrial development and export authority, see 3 AAC, part 13.